Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Alcoholic Beverages Generally — Permits
3-4-403. Class A permit violations.

The following acts on the part of any permittee are Class A permit violations:

(1)

Failure to furnish access to premises by any law enforcement officer or any authorized Alcoholic Beverage Control Division personnel or failure to cooperate or take reasonable action to assist any such law enforcement officers or authorized division personnel who are on the permitted premises in the performance of their duties;

(2)

Failure to allow inspection of books or records;

(3)

Posting permit on unauthorized premises;

(4)

Manufacture or possession of controlled beverage with excess alcoholic content;

(5)

Sale by a manufacturer to other than a wholesaler. Provided, sales authorized by any law of the state relating to native wines shall not constitute a violation;

(6)

Sale by a wholesaler to other than a retailer;

(7)

Ownership or other interest in retail outlet by a manufacturer or a wholesaler. Provided, that such ownership or other interest authorized by any law of this state relating to native wines shall not be a violation;

(8)

Unauthorized gift or service to retailers by a manufacturer or a wholesaler;

(9)

Use of post-dated checks for payment of controlled beverages and merchandise;

(10)

Wholesaler making delivery to a consumer;

(11)

The permittee possessed or knew or reasonably should have known that any agent or employee or patron of the establishment possessed on the permitted premises any illegal drug or narcotic or controlled substance or that any agent or employee while acting on the permittee's behalf knowingly allowed the possession on the permitted premises of any illegal drug or narcotic or controlled substance;

(12)

Selling or allowing the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the permitted premises when the permit is suspended or on inactive status;

(13)

Selling to minors;

(14)

Unauthorized employment of a minor;

(15)(A)

Disorderly conduct or a breach of the peace by a patron or employee on the permitted premises.

(B)

As used in subdivision (15)(A) of this section, “disorderly conduct” includes without limitation a fight, brawl, or disturbance that results in bodily injury to a person on the permitted premises;

(16)

Violation of §3-3-218;

(17)

Selling to an intoxicated person;

(18)

Unauthorized manufacturing, selling, offering, dispensing, or giving away of controlled beverages;

(19)(A)

Conducting or permitting gambling on premises.

(B)

Conducting or permitting gambling under subdivision (19)(A) of this section does not include:

(i)

Charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-101 et seq.; or

(ii)

A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq.;

(20)

Violation of legal closing hours; and

(21)(A)

Possession of a weapon on the permitted premises by a person without a possessory or proprietary interest in the permitted premises.

(B)

When the permitted premises is a retail liquor store that sells alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption, an employee of the retail liquor store that is licensed to carry a concealed handgun by the state may possess a handgun on the permitted premises if the possession of the handgun is permitted under state law.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346; Acts 1991, No. 605, § 1; 1993, No. 172, § 2; 2009, No. 294, § 4; 2009, No. 605, § 9; 2009, No. 606, § 9; 2013, No. 760, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 9, amended §3-4-404(21) to add exemptions to the Class B violation of conducting or permitting gambling on premises for charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-01 et seq. and a lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq. However, Acts 2009, No. 294 §§ 4 and 5, transferred the gambling violation from §3-4-404 to §3-4-403(19) and made it a Class A violation. As a result, Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 9, are codified as §3-4-403(19)(B).

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 294 added (13) through (21) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by identical acts Nos. 605 and 606 inserted (19)(B).

The 2013 amendment added (21)(B) and the (A) designation.

3-4-404. Class B permit violations.

The following acts on the part of the permittee are Class B permit violations:

(1)

Pledge, hypothecation, or use of a permit as collateral;

(2)

Defacing, destroying, or altering a permit;

(3)

Transporting controlled beverages in violation of rules or law;

(4)

Manufacturing, selling, offering, dispensing, or giving away, possessing, or transporting controlled beverages upon which tax is not paid;

(5)

Failure to maintain proper records by a manufacturer;

(6)

Failure by a wholesaler to maintain proper records;

(7)

Failure by a wholesaler to register new brands;

(8)

Giving samples without authorization;

(9)

Sales for anything other than cash or check;

(10)

Delivery without an invoice by a wholesaler;

(11)

Selling to the insane;

(12)

Selling to bootleggers;

(13)

Accepting food stamps in payment for controlled beverages;

(14)

Unlawful manufacture or sale in a dry area; and

(15)

Sale of controlled beverages by vending machine.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346; Acts 1991, No. 605, § 2; 1993, No. 172, § 3; 2009, No. 294, § 5; 2009, No. 605, § 9; 2009, No. 606, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 49.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 9, amended §3-4-404(21) to add exemptions to the Class B violation of conducting or permitting gambling on premises for charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-01 et seq. and a lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq. However, Acts 2009, No. 294 §§ 4 and 5, transferred the gambling violation from §3-4-404 to §3-4-403(19) and made it a Class A violation. As a result, Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 9, are codified as §3-4-403(19)(B).

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 294 deleted (11), (15) through (19), (21), (22), and (24), redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by identical acts Nos. 605 and 606 inserted (21)(B), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (3).

3-4-405. Class C permit violations.

(a)

The following acts on the part of any permittee are Class C permit violations:

(1)

Sale of controlled beverages when the permit is not posted;

(2)

Failure to maintain health, safety, and sanitary standards;

(3)

Removing or obliterating a container label or mark;

(4)

Consuming a controlled beverage while on duty;

(5)

Failure to surrender a permit when the business has been voluntarily inoperative for over thirty (30) days;

(6)

Storing controlled beverages in unauthorized warehouses, with each day constituting a separate offense after notice;

(7)

Failure to make proper application and obtain approval for acting as a sales agent for a manufacturer, wholesaler, or rectifier unless duly authorized by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(8)

Use of an unlabeled dispensing faucet;

(9)

Failure of a retailer to keep and maintain records;

(10)

Unauthorized sale of broken packages and merchandise;

(11)

Negligently allowing prostitutes to frequent the premises;

(12)

Allowing immoral conduct on the premises;

(13)

Disposing of or receiving samples by a retailer;

(14)

Negligently selling to users of narcotics;

(15)

Delivery of controlled beverages by a retailer away from his or her permitted premises;

(16)

Sale of controlled beverages in a container or of a size other than that approved;

(17)

Misrepresentation of a brand, or keeping beverages in an unauthorized container, or refilling, diluting, or failing to destroy empty bottles;

(18)

Failure to maintain membership books or properly maintain guestbooks by a private club;

(19)

Allowing an unauthorized guest in a private club;

(20)

Dispensing to nonmembers or nonguests by a private club;

(21)

Unauthorized purchasing by a private club from other than a retailer;

(22)

Failure of a private club to maintain financial records;

(23)

Failure by a private club to furnish the name and address of the authorized public accountant and bookkeeper;

(24)

Unauthorized advertising by a private club;

(25)

Unauthorized transportation of alcoholic beverages through a dry area without a permit; and

(26)

Failure to keep and maintain records or make a report.

(b)

Any other act that is determined at an appropriate hearing by the director to be a violation will be considered a Class C permit violation and may be fined accordingly.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346; Acts 1991, No. 605, § 3.

3-4-406. Failure to pay invoices.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized to maintain a list of permit holders who have failed to pay invoices forwarded by persons holding wholesale liquor permits as issued by the division.

(b)

Failure to pay an invoice shall not constitute an administrative violation per se, and the list shall be maintained for such purposes as the division shall determine.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-347.

3-4-407. Violation of local closing hours laws.

(a)

The General Assembly, by legislation, and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, by rule, have created general closing hours for establishments which sell or dispense alcoholic beverages. However, the General Assembly and the division have also given the power to local city governments or local county quorum courts to adopt hours of operation which are more restrictive than the general hours of operation stated for certain permits issued by the division. It is recognized that it is more convenient for local authorities to change local ordinances on a basis that can be more frequent than the basis with which the General Assembly meets or the division adopts rules. For that reason, local control of these issues, as allowed by Code sections and regulations, is desirable. It is also recognized that when a city or county adopts a more restrictive law in this area it is unnecessary and burdensome for the city or county to notify the division each time that a modification is made to local laws, and for this reason enforcement of more restrictive ordinances should be by local law enforcement personnel who are attached to the jurisdiction which creates the more restrictive hours-of-operations law.

(b)

It is hereby provided that when any permittee of the division is cited with a violation of any local closing hour ordinance adopted by a city government or a county government, that violation of an ordinance which is more restrictive than provided for by the state shall be punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) to five hundred dollars ($500) and that violation shall not be considered to be an administrative violation against the permit issued by the division.

(c)

Enforcement of the more restrictive local ordinances and the issuance of citations for violations thereof shall be by local law enforcement officers within the jurisdiction where such ordinance is in effect. Such citations shall be heard only in a local court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 305, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 50.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulations” in the first sentence of (a), and “rules” for “regulations” in the third sentence of (a).

Subchapter 5

— Disposition of Fees and Taxes

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 13(a): Oct. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of this act become effective on October 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-4-501. When fees due — Disposition.

(a)

All license taxes provided and levies under this act shall be due and payable on the tenth day of each month succeeding the time when the act is done requiring the license.

(b)

It shall be the duty of the person required to pay the license to make a report giving the facts in such form and substance as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall by rule require. All payments therefor shall be made to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, payable to the Treasurer of State, and all permit fees shall likewise be made to the secretary and payable to the Treasurer of State.

(c)(1)

Except for grocery store wine permit fees under §3-5-1802, all permits or license fees or taxes, penalties, fines, and costs received by the secretary under the provisions of this act shall be general revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund.

(2)

The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the amounts to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 14131; Acts 1953, No. 118, § 32(E); A.S.A. 1947, § 48-325; Acts 2017, No. 508, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3308.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (c) as (c)(1) and (c)(2); and substituted “Except for grocery store wine permit fees under §3-5-1802, all” for “All” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” twice in (b), and in (c)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-4-502. Fines.

When any fine is levied and collected under subchapter 4 of this chapter, the revenue shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund Account.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346.

3-4-503. Suits to restrain collection — Refunds.

(a)

No suit shall be maintained in any court to restrain or delay the collection or payment of any fee or tax levied by this act.

(b)

The aggrieved taxpayer or permittee shall pay the tax or fee as and when required and may at any time within two (2) years from the date of payment sue the state through its agent, the Auditor of State, in an action at law in any state or federal court otherwise having jurisdiction of the parties and subject matter for the recovery of the tax or fee paid with legal interest thereon from the date of payment.

(c)(1)

If it is finally determined that the tax or fee or any part thereof was wrongfully collected, for any reason, it shall be the duty of the Auditor of State to issue his or her warrant on the Treasurer of State for the amount of the tax or fee so adjudged to have been wrongfully collected, together with legal interest thereon.

(2)

The Treasurer of State shall pay the Auditor of State's warrant at once out of the General Revenue Fund Account of the state in preference to other warrants or claims against the state.

(d)

A separate suit need not be filed for each individual payment made by any taxpayer, but a recovery may be had in one (1) suit for as many payments as may have been made.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 5, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14133; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-326.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be affected by the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, §26-18-101 et seq.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-501.

Subchapter 6

— Particular Permits

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 2, created a new §3-4-608. However, pursuant to §1-2-303, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission reassigned Acts 2009, No. 763, § 2, to §3-9-239.

Cross References.

Vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1973, No. 299, § 2: Mar. 12, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and declared by the General Assembly that this bill is essential to the proper preservation of revenues; an emergency is therefore declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 420, § 3: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be renewable annually no later than August 31; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 675, § 8: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be authorized to retain ½ of the application permit fees in instances where the permits are denied in order to partially defray the cost of reviewing the permit application and this act is necessary to authorize the same. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1105, § 4: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a supplier of an alcoholic beverage is not required to file an application with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division each calendar year; that suppliers should be required to register with the division each calendar year; and that the division's yearly registration period begins on April 1. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 13(a): Oct. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of this act become effective on October 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 1117, § 3: Apr. 7, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is essential to the public interest and operation of the alcohol laws in the State of Arkansas; that this act eliminates conflicting language and allows consistent application of alcohol laws; that this act is immediately necessary due to the substantial growth and continued expansion of the distilling industry in Arkansas; that clear and consistent application of the law to the distilling industry is in the public's immediate interest as is controlling the distribution of alcoholic beverages within the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-4-601. Kinds of permits generally.

(a)

There shall be various kinds of permits, including without limitation:

(1)

Distiller's permit;

(2)

Brewer's permit;

(3)

Rectifier's permit;

(4)

Wholesaler's permit;

(5)

Dispenser's permit;

(6)

Hotel, restaurant, or club permit;

(7)

Grocery store wine permit;

(8)

Layout center permit; and

(9)

Hard cider manufacturing permit.

(b)

Each kind of permit shall be distinctive in color and design so as to be readily distinguishable from each other.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14105; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-302; Acts 2017, No. 508, § 3; 2017, No. 726, § 1; 2019, No. 691, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 508, in the introductory language, added the (a) designation, substituted “various” for “six (6)”, and substituted “including without limitation” for “each of which shall be distinctive in color and design so as to be readily distinguishable from each other, to wit”; added (a)(7); and added (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 726 substituted “seven (7)” for “six (6)” in the introductory language; and added (7) [now (8)].

The 2019 amendment added (a)(9).

Cross References.

Permit to transport, §3-7-106.

3-4-602. Distillers or manufacturers.

(a)

Any person may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to manufacture, distill, import, transport, store, and sell to a wholesaler, jobber, or distributor spirituous, vinous (except small farm wines), or malt liquors to be used and sold for beverage purposes.

(b)

The application shall be in writing and verified and shall set forth in detail such information concerning the applicant for the permit and the premises to be used therefor as the director shall require.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required by this act for the permit.

(d)

If the director grants the application, he or she shall issue a permit in such form as shall be determined by rules established by the director.

(e)

The permit shall contain a description of the premises to be used by the applicant and in form and in substance shall be a permit to the person therein specifically designated to manufacture, distill, transport, and sell to a wholesaler, jobber, or distributor spirituous, vinous (except small farm wines), or malt liquors in or from the premises therein specifically authorized.

(f)

No distiller or manufacturer shall sell or contract to sell any spirituous, vinous (except small farm wines), or malt liquors referred to herein to any wholesaler, distributor, or jobber, or to any other person who is not duly authorized under this act to receive, possess, transport, distribute, or sell those liquors.

(g)

Under rules adopted by the director, a distiller or manufacturer may:

(1)

Sell, deliver, or transport to wholesalers;

(2)

Sell, deliver, or transport to rectifiers;

(3)

Export out of the state;

(4)

Sell for off-premises consumption spirituous or vinous liquors the distiller or manufacturer manufactures on any day of the week;

(5)

Serve on the premises complimentary samples of liquors produced by the distiller or manufacturer;

(6)

Sell at retail, by the drink or by the package, spirituous or vinous liquors produced on the premises of the distillery if all sales occur in a wet territory; and

(7)

Sell for consumption on the premises of the manufacturer:

(A)

Liquors produced by the manufacturer or liquors that the manufacturer may purchase from wholesalers licensed by the state;

(B)

Wine;

(C)

Beer; and

(D)

Malt liquor.

(h)(1)

For the privilege of distilling spirituous liquors or manufacturing malt liquors, each person engaged in distilling spirituous liquors or manufacturing malt liquors shall pay an annual permit fee of three hundred dollars ($300) for each manufacturing or distilling plant.

(2)

For the privilege of manufacturing vinous liquors (except small farm wines), there is assessed and there shall be paid an annual permit fee of and by every person engaged therein. The permit fee shall be in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each manufacturing plant.

(3)

However, for the privilege of distilling brandy or spirituous liquors for use only in the fortifying of native wines, which are wines manufactured from the juices of grapes, berries, and other fruits or vegetables grown in this state, there shall be collected an annual permit fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each manufacturing or distilling plant.

(i)

Liquors may be sold for on-premises sale or off-premises sale, or both, for consumption during all legal operating hours in which business is normally and legally conducted on the premises if:

(1)

The manufacturer provides tours through its facility; and

(2)

Only sealed containers are removed from the premises.

(j)(1)

A manufacturer may provide liquor it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations or sell for resale liquor it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations holding valid special event permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(2)

The sale of products under subdivision (j)(1) of this section is limited to the duration of the particular special event.

(k)(1)

If approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and if the division receives written notice at least five (5) days before the event, the division may authorize a distiller or manufacturer to conduct a spirituous or vinous liquor tasting event for educational or promotional purposes at any location in a wet area of this state.

(2)(A)

Before an authorization is issued under subdivision (k)(1) of this section, the division shall receive written notice of the spirituous or vinous liquor tasting event at least two (2) weeks before the event.

(B)

A spirituous or vinous liquor tasting event may be held under this subsection in any facility licensed by the division in a wet area of this state.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 3; 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 14107, 14127; Acts 1939, No. 302, § 1; 1983, No. 675, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-303, 48-321; Acts 2011, No. 827, § 1; 2015, No. 1143, § 1; 2017, No. 1117, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 51; 2019, No. 740, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Pursuant to §3-1-103, only wines or vinous liquors manufactured in the State of Arkansas are exempted from the provisions of Acts 1935, No. 108.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (g).

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment added (g)(5) through (7) and (i) through (k).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 740 inserted “small farm” in (a), (f), and (h); substituted “grants” for “shall grant” in (d); inserted “(except small farm wines)” in (e); inserted “or vinous” in (g)(4), (g)(6), (k)(2)(A), and (k)(2)(B); deleted “and every” following “each” in the second sentence of (h)(2); and inserted “or manufacturer” and “or vinous” in (k)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-4-603. Rectifiers.

(a)

Any person may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit for the rectifying, purifying, mixing, blending, or flavoring of spirituous liquors or the bottling, warehousing, or other handling or distribution of rectified distilled spirits.

(b)

The application shall be in writing and verified and shall set forth in detail such information concerning the applicant for the permit and the premises to be used therefor as the director shall require.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required by this act for the permit.

(d)

If the director shall grant the application, he or she shall issue a permit in such form as shall be determined by rules.

(e)

The permit shall contain a description of the premises to be used by the applicant and in form and in substance shall be a permit to the person therein specifically designated to purify, mix, blend, or flavor spirituous or vinous liquors or to bottle, warehouse, or otherwise handle or distribute rectified distilled spirits in the premises therein specifically authorized.

(f)

The director shall have absolute discretion as to the location of the premises to be used.

(g)

Under such rules as may be adopted by the director, any rectifier may sell, deliver, or transport only:

(1)

To wholesalers;

(2)

To other rectifiers; and

(3)

For the purpose of export out of the state.

(h)

For the privilege of rectifying, blending, or flavoring spirituous liquors, there is assessed and there shall be paid an annual permit fee of and by every person engaged therein the sum of fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) for each and every rectifying, blending, or flavoring plant.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 4; 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 14108, 14128; Acts 1983, No. 675, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-304, 48-322.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-602.

Cross References.

Dispensary defined, §3-1-102.

Form of Permit.

This section leaves no discretion to the Commissioner of Revenues (now Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division) as to the form and substance of a rectifier permit. McCarroll v. Southwest Distilled Prods., Inc., 198 Ark. 729, 131 S.W.2d 5 (1939).

Cited:

Hinton v. State ex rel. Purcell, 246 Ark. 341, 438 S.W.2d 57 (1969).

3-4-604. Retailers.

(a)

A person, other than a distiller, importer, rectifier, or wholesaler, may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to sell and dispense vinous or spirituous liquors or hard cider for beverage purposes at retail.

(b)

The application shall be in writing and shall set forth in detail such information concerning the applicant for the permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the director may require.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required by this act for the permit.

(d)

If the director shall grant the application, he or she shall issue a permit in such form as shall be determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(e)

The permit shall contain a description of the premises permitted and in form and substance shall be a permit to the person specifically designated in the permit to sell and dispense at retail spirituous or vinous liquors or hard cider.

(f)

All such sales shall be in unbroken packages that shall not be opened or the contents or any part consumed on the premises where purchased.

(g)

For the privilege of operating a dispensary from which the vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors (except wines) or hard cider are to be dispensed in the manner provided in this act, there is assessed and there shall be paid a permit fee of and by the person engaged therein in the sum of four hundred dollars ($400) per annum payable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 6; 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 4; Pope's Dig., §§ 14110, 14130; Acts 1983, No. 420, § 1; 1983, No. 675, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-309, 48-313.1, 48-324; Acts 2019, No. 691, §§ 6, 7.

Publisher's Notes.

For exclusion of wines, see Publisher's Notes to §3-4-602.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” in (a), (e), and (g); and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-602.

Cross References.

Additional fee for operation of dispensary, §3-7-111.

Additional permit fee generally, §3-7-111.

Retail liquor dealer permitted to sell native wines without additional license, §3-5-102.

3-4-605. Wholesalers.

(a)

A person other than a distiller, manufacturer, rectifier, or importer may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), beer, hard cider, or malt liquors at wholesale.

(b)

The application shall be in writing and shall set forth in detail such information concerning the applicant for the permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the director may require.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required by this act for the permit.

(d)

If the director grants the application, he or she shall issue a permit in a form as determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(e)

The permit shall contain a description of the premises permitted and in form and substance shall be a permit to the person specifically designated in the permit to sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), beer, hard cider, or malt liquors for beverage purposes.

(f)

A person holding a distiller's or rectifier's permit need not obtain a wholesaler's permit in order to sell at wholesale spirituous liquor or wine as defined in §3-9-301(7).

(g)(1)(A)

A person other than a person holding a distiller's, manufacturer's, or rectifier's permit shall not sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, or malt liquors at wholesale.

(B)

A person other than a person holding a wholesaler's permit shall not sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), or malt liquors at wholesale.

(2)

A wholesaler holding a permit shall not sell or buy from another unless he or she holds a permit, but a wholesaler may export from or import into this state liquors under rules promulgated by the division.

(h)

A wholesaler shall not sell or contract to sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), beer, hard cider, or malt liquors to a dispensary, hotel, restaurant, or club if the dispensary, hotel, restaurant, or club is not authorized under this act to receive, possess, transport, distribute, or sell spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), beer, hard cider, or malt liquors.

(i)

Further, a licensed wholesaler in Arkansas of spirituous liquor, beer, hard cider, or wine as defined in §3-9-301(7) may only purchase spirituous liquor, beer, hard cider, or wine as defined in §3-9-301(7) from a distiller, importer, rectifier, hard cider manufacturer, or a domestic wine producer. However, this restriction does not apply to the purchase of native wines.

(j)(1)

For the privilege of storing, transporting, and selling spirituous liquor, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), beer, hard cider, or malt liquors at wholesale, there is assessed and there shall be paid an annual permit fee of and by every person engaged therein. The permit fee shall be in the sum of seven hundred dollars ($700) for each separate and distinct establishment.

(2)

However, this section does not apply to residents of Arkansas who store, transport, and sell wine or hard cider at wholesale manufactured by them in this state.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 5; 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 14109, 14129; Acts 1973, No. 299, § 1; 1983, No. 675, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-305, 48-323; Acts 2009, No. 294, § 6; 2019, No. 691, §§ 8, 9.

Publisher's Notes.

For exclusion of wines, see Publisher's Notes to §3-4-602.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “liquor” following “spirituous” in (a), (e), (h), (i), and (j)(1); substituted “wine as defined in §3-9-301(2)” for “vinous” in (e), (h), and (j)(1), for “vinous (except wines)”
in (a) and (g)(1)(A), and for “vinous liquors” in (f) and (i); inserted “beer” in (a), (e), (h), (i), and (j)(1); inserted (g)(1)(B), redesignated (g) accordingly, and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (g)(2); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “hard cider” throughout the section; inserted “hard cider manufacturer” in (i); and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-602.

Cross References.

Additional permit tax, §3-7-111.

Brandy, manufacture and sale, §3-6-102.

Wholesalers, sales of malt liquor of greater than 5% alcohol, §3-5-101.